Hawaii statutes.
[§663-1.52] Exception to liability for
county lifeguard services. [Section repealed June 30, 2017. L 2014, c
98, §1.] (a) For the purpose of this section:

"County lifeguard" means a person
employed as a lifeguard by a county of this State.

"Employing county" means the county
employing a county lifeguard.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, a county lifeguard, the employing county, and the State shall not be
liable for any civil damages resulting from any act or omission of the lifeguard
while providing rescue, resuscitative, or other lifeguard services on the beach
or in the ocean in the scope of employment as a county lifeguard. This
exception from liability, however, shall not apply when the claim for civil
damages results from a county lifeguard's gross negligence or wanton act or
omission. [L 2002, c 170, §§1, 5; am L 2007, c 152, §4; am L 2009, c 81, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next